Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201284-907.09
Adoption, amendment,
or repeal of rule or regulation; provide information to Governor.

Whenever an agency proposes to adopt, amend, or repeal a rule
or regulation, (1) at least thirty days before the public hearing, when notice
of a proposed rule or regulation is sent out, or (2) at the same time the
agency applies to the Governor for a waiver of the notice of public hearing
under section 84-907, the agency shall provide to the Governor for review
(a) a description of the proposed rule or regulation and the entity or entities
it will impact, (b) an explanation of the necessity of the proposed rule or
regulation, including the identification of the specific legislative bill if applicable, or the authorizing statute when there is
no legislative bill applicable, (c) a statement that the proposed
rule or regulation is consistent with legislative intent, (d) a statement
indicating whether the proposed rule or regulation is the result of a state
mandate on a local governmental subdivision and if the mandate is funded,
(e) a statement indicating if the proposed rule or regulation is the result
of a federal mandate on state government or on a local governmental subdivision
and if the mandate is funded, (f) a description, including an estimated quantification,
of the fiscal impact on state agencies, political subdivisions, and regulated
persons, (g) a statement that the agency will solicit public comment on the
proposed rule or regulation before the public hearing, and (h) a statement
indicating whether or not the agency has utilized the negotiated rulemaking
process as provided for in the Negotiated Rulemaking Act with respect to the
proposed rule or regulation.

Laws 2005, LB 373, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB617, § 3.

Negotiated Rulemaking Act, see section 84-921.